Utah statutes.
78B-6-312.   Imprisonment to compel performance.

When the contempt consists of the omission to perform an act enjoined by law, which is yet in the power of the person to perform, the person may be imprisoned until the act is performed, or until released by the court.  The act shall be specified in the warrant of commitment.

